Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 10 Attorney for Receipt of Process

39-10-1.
Corporations required to comply with chapter.

No corporation unless incorporated by the general assembly, and no person or partnership unless the person or partnership or the members of the partnership are residents of this state, shall transport or engage in the transportation of any goods, wares, merchandise, or parcels of any description within this state until the corporation, person, or partnership shall have complied with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 189, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 391, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-10-1

.

39-10-2.
Appointment of attorney to receive process and appear.

Every corporation, person, or partnership shall by a written power appoint some citizen of this state, resident therein, as attorney, with power and authority to accept service of all lawful process against the corporation, person, or partnership, and to cause an appearance to be entered in like manner as if the corporation had existed or the person or the members of the partnership had been residents of and been duly served with process within the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 160, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 189, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 391, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

39-10-2

.

39-10-3.
Filing of power of attorney — Receipt in evidence.

A copy of a power of attorney duly certified and authenticated shall be filed with the secretary of state, and copies thereof duly certified shall be received in evidence in all courts in the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 160, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 189, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 391, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-10-3

.

39-10-4.
Replacement of attorney on termination of power.

If the attorney shall die or resign or be removed, the corporation, individual, or partnership shall make a new appointment, as provided in §

39-10-2

, and file a copy with the secretary of state as provided in §

39-10-3

, so that at all times there shall be within the state an attorney authorized as provided in §

39-10-2

; and no power of attorney shall be revoked until after like power shall have been given to some competent person and a copy thereof filed as provided in §

39-10-3

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 160, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 189, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 391, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-10-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 111.

39-10-5.
Service on attorney.

Service of process upon an attorney shall be deemed sufficient service upon his or her principals.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 160, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 189, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 391, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-10-5

.

39-10-6.
Corporation charter or list of partners filed.

Every corporation or partnership shall file in the office of the secretary of state, with the written power described in §

39-10-2

, a copy of the charter of the corporation or a list of the names and the places of residence of all the members of the co-partnership.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 160, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 189, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 391, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-10-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 111.

39-10-7.
Penalty for violations.

Every person, corporation, or co-partnership violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall forfeit five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 160, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 189, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 391, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

39-10-7

.